Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 1. Preliminary Provisions; Power to Adjust.

Sec. 13.38.200.
Fiduciary duties; general principles.

In allocating receipts and disbursements to or between principal and income and with respect to any matter within the scope of this chapter, a fiduciary

shall administer a trust or estate in accordance with the governing instrument, even if there is a different provision in this chapter;

may administer a trust or estate by the exercise of a discretionary power of administration regarding a matter within the scope of this chapter given to the fiduciary by the governing instrument, even if the exercise of the power produces a result different from a result required or permitted by this chapter; an inference that the fiduciary has improperly exercised the discretionary power does not arise from the fact that the fiduciary has made an allocation contrary to a provision of this chapter;

shall administer a trust or estate in accordance with this chapter if the governing instrument does not contain a different provision or does not give the fiduciary a discretionary power of administration regarding a matter within the scope of this chapter; and

shall add a receipt or charge a disbursement to principal to the extent that the governing instrument and this chapter do not provide a rule for allocating the receipt or disbursement to or between principal and income.

In exercising a discretionary power of administration regarding a matter within the scope of this chapter, whether granted by the governing instrument or this chapter, including AS

13.38.210

and

13.38.300

—

13.38.435

, a fiduciary shall administer a trust or estate impartially based on what is fair and reasonable to all of the beneficiaries, except to the extent that the governing instrument clearly manifests an intention that the fiduciary shall or may favor one or more of the beneficiaries. A determination in accordance with this chapter is presumed to be fair and reasonable to all of the beneficiaries.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003; am § 16 ch 45 SLA 2013)

Sec. 13.38.210.
Trustee’s power to adjust.

Subject to (c) and (f) of this section, a trustee may adjust between principal and income by allocating an amount of income to principal or an amount of principal to income to the extent the trustee considers appropriate if

the governing instrument describes what may or shall be distributed to a beneficiary by referring to the trust’s income;

the trustee determines, after applying the rules in AS

13.38.200(a)

, that the trustee is unable to comply with AS

13.38.200(b)

; and

the trustee determines to follow an investment policy seeking a total return for the investments held by the trust, whether the return is to be derived from

appreciation of capital;

earnings and distributions from capital; or

both (A) and (B) of this paragraph.

In deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power conferred by (a) of this section, a trustee may consider, among other things,

the size of the trust;

the nature and estimated duration of the trust;

the liquidity and distribution requirements of the trust;

the need for regular distributions and preservation and appreciation of capital;

the expected tax consequences of an adjustment;

the net amount allocated to income under the other sections of this chapter and the increase or decrease in the value of the principal assets, which the trustee may estimate as to assets for which market values are not readily available;

the assets held in the trust; the extent to which the assets consist of financial assets, interests in closely held enterprises, tangible and intangible personal property, or real property; the extent to which an asset is used by a beneficiary; and whether an asset was purchased by the trustee or received from the settlor or testator;

to the extent reasonably known to the trustee, the need of the beneficiaries for present and future distributions authorized or required by the governing instrument;

whether and to what extent the governing instrument gives the trustee the power to invade principal or accumulate income or prohibits the trustee from invading principal or accumulating income, and the extent to which the trustee has exercised a power from time to time to invade principal or accumulate income;

the intent of the settlor or testator; and

the actual and anticipated effect of economic conditions on principal and income and the effects of inflation and deflation.

A trustee may not make an adjustment under this section if

the adjustment would diminish the income interest in a trust that requires all of the income to be paid at least annually to a spouse and for which a federal estate tax or gift tax marital deduction would be allowed, in whole or in part, if the trustee did not have the power to make the adjustment; the prohibition in this paragraph does not apply to a trust after the trustee determines that the marital deduction has not been claimed or has not been allowed;

the adjustment would reduce the actuarial value of the income interest in a trust to which a person transfers property with the intent to qualify for a federal gift tax exclusion;

the adjustment would change the amount payable to a beneficiary as a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of the trust assets;

the adjustment is from any amount that is permanently set aside for charitable purposes under the governing instrument and for which a federal estate or gift tax charitable deduction has been taken, unless both income and principal are permanently set aside for charitable purposes under the governing instrument;

possessing or exercising the power to make an adjustment would cause an individual to be treated as the owner of all or part of the trust for federal income tax purposes, and the individual would not be treated as the owner if the trustee did not possess the power to make an adjustment;

possessing or exercising the power to make an adjustment would cause all or part of the trust assets to be subject to federal estate or gift tax with respect to an individual, and the assets would not be subject to federal estate or gift tax with respect to the individual if the trustee did not possess the power to make an adjustment;

the trustee is a beneficiary of the trust; or

the trust has been converted to a unitrust under AS

13.38.300

—

13.38.435

.

If (c)(5), (6), or (7) of this section applies to a trustee and there is more than one trustee, a co-trustee to whom the provision does not apply may make the adjustment unless the exercise of the power by the remaining trustee or trustees is prohibited by the governing instrument.

A trustee may release the entire power conferred by (a) of this section, the power to adjust from income to principal, or the power to adjust from principal to income if the trustee is uncertain about whether possessing or exercising the power will cause a result described in (c)(1) — (6) of this section, or if the trustee determines that possessing or exercising the power will or may deprive the trust of a tax benefit or impose a tax burden not described in (c) of this section. The release may be permanent or for a specified period, including a period measured by the life of an individual.

A governing instrument that limits the power of a trustee to make an adjustment between principal and income does not affect the application of this section unless it is clear from the governing instrument that it is intended to deny the trustee the power of adjustment conferred by (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003; am § 17 ch 45 SLA 2013)

Sec. 13.38.220.
Judicial control of discretionary powers.

A court may not change a fiduciary’s decision to exercise or not to exercise a discretionary power conferred by this chapter unless the court determines that the decision was an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion.

If a court determines that a fiduciary has abused the fiduciary’s discretion regarding a discretionary power conferred by this chapter, the remedy is to restore the income and remainder beneficiaries to the positions they would have occupied if the fiduciary had not abused the fiduciary’s discretion, according to the following rules:

to the extent that the abuse of discretion has not resulted in a distribution to a beneficiary or has resulted in a distribution that is too small, the court shall require the fiduciary to distribute from the trust an amount to the beneficiary that the court determines will restore the beneficiary, in whole or in part, to the beneficiary’s appropriate position;

to the extent that the abuse of discretion has resulted in a distribution to a beneficiary that is too large, the court shall restore the beneficiaries, the trust, or both, in whole or in part, to their appropriate positions by requiring the fiduciary to withhold an amount from one or more future distributions to the beneficiary who received the distribution that was too large or by requiring that beneficiary or that beneficiary’s estate to return some or all of the distribution to the trust, notwithstanding a spendthrift or similar provision;

if the abuse of discretion concerns the power to convert a trust into a unitrust, the court shall require the trustee either to convert into a unitrust or to reconvert from a unitrust;

to the extent that the court is unable, after applying (1) — (3) of this subsection, to restore the beneficiaries, the trust, or both to the positions they would have occupied if the fiduciary had not abused the fiduciary’s discretion, the court may require the fiduciary to pay an appropriate amount from the fiduciary’s own funds to one or more of the beneficiaries, the trust, or both.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)